Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2204
Appraisal, defined.

Appraisal means (1) as a noun, an opinion of value or the act or process of developing an opinion of value or (2) as an adjective, pertaining to appraising and related functions such as real property appraisal practice. An appraisal is numerically expressed as a specific amount, as a range of numbers, or as a relationship to a previous value opinion or numerical benchmark.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 54.